Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. General Provisions

38-35-101.
Acknowledgments - form - prima facie evidence.

No officer authorized to take acknowledgments of instruments affecting title to real property shall take or certify such acknowledgments unless the person making the same is personally known to such officer to be the identical person he represents himself to be or is proved to be such by at least one credible person known to such officer. It shall not be necessary to state such fact in his certificate of acknowledgment attached to any instrument affecting title to real property.

Any deed or other instrument relating to or affecting title to real property acknowledged substantially in accordance with the following form before a proper official shall be prima facie evidence of the proper execution thereof:

:u000 STATE OF COLORADO :u1860 )
:u1860 ) ss.
:u000 County of ................................................:u1860 )

The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me this ........ day of ................, 20...., by .................................................................................................................... .
(if by natural person or persons, insert name or names; if by person acting in representative or official capacity or as attorney-in-fact, insert name of person as executor, attorney-in-fact, or other capacity or description; if by officer of corporation, insert name of such officer or officers as the president or other officers of such corporation, naming it). If acknowledgment is taken by a notary public, the date of expiration of his commission shall also appear on the certificate.
Witness my hand and official seal.
=sr ........................................
=sr Title of Officer

As to any instrument acknowledged substantially in accordance with the above form of acknowledgment, such acknowledgment shall be prima facie evidence:

That the person named therein as acknowledging the instrument appeared in person before the official taking the acknowledgment and was personally known to such official to be the person whose name was subscribed to the instrument and that such person acknowledged that he signed the instrument as his free and voluntary act for the uses and purposes therein set forth;

If the acknowledgment is by a person in a representative or official capacity, that the person acknowledging the instrument acknowledged it to be his free and voluntary act in such capacity or as the free and voluntary act of the principal, person, or entity represented;

If the person acknowledging is an officer of a corporation, that such person was known to the official taking the acknowledgment to be such corporate officer and that the instrument was executed and acknowledged by such corporate officer, with proper authority from the corporation, as the act of such corporation;

If the persons acknowledging are directors, trustees, or managers of a dissolved or expired corporation, acting last before the time of the dissolution or expiration of such corporation, or the survivors of them, that such persons were such corporate directors, trustees, or managers, or the survivors of them, and that the instrument was executed and acknowledged by them with proper authority;

If the person acknowledging is a partner, that such person was such partner and that the instrument was executed and acknowledged by such partner with proper authority from such partnership as the act of such partnership.

If such instrument has been acknowledged in the manner provided in this section and has been recorded in the office of the proper county clerk and recorder, it shall also be prima facie evidence of due delivery of such instrument, irrespective of the length of time that may have elapsed between the date of such instrument and the date when such instrument was so recorded. The provisions of this section shall relate and apply to all instruments which have been executed prior to May 4, 1937, as well as to all instruments which are executed after said date, irrespective of whether such instruments have been acknowledged before or after said date and irrespective of whether such instruments are recorded before or after said date.

The seal required to be affixed to a deed or other instrument under the provisions of this section may consist of a rubber stamp with a facsimile affixed thereon of the seal required to be used and may be placed or stamped upon the deed or other instrument requiring the seal with indelible ink.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 585, § 1.

CSA:

C. 40, § 107.

L. 37:

P. 477, § 1.

L. 39:

P. 289, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-1.

L. 55:

P. 721, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-1.

L. 75:

(5) added, p. 489, § 7, effective July 14.

38-35-102.
When unacknowledged instruments prima facie evidence.

When an instrument, which by its terms constitutes a promise or obligation for the payment of money and also by its terms gives or creates or purports to give or to create a lien upon real estate as security for the payment of such money, at the time that such instrument has been filed for record in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which said real estate is situate, irrespective of whether such recording is the original recording of such instrument or a recording of such instrument subsequent to its original recording, bears upon its face or upon its back an assignment, transfer, or endorsement thereof, such instrument and such assignment, transfer, or endorsement thereof or the recorded copy of such instrument and of such assignment, transfer, or endorsement thereof or a certified copy of the recorded copy of said instrument and of such assignment, transfer, or endorsement thereof certified by the county clerk and recorder shall be admissible in evidence as and shall constitute prima facie evidence of such transfer, assignment, or endorsement of such instrument from the person whose purported signature is affixed to such assignment, transfer, or endorsement to the person named in such assignment, transfer, or endorsement as the assignee, transferee, or endorsee of such instrument, irrespective of whether or not such assignment, transfer, or endorsement has been acknowledged in the manner provided by law for the acknowledgment of instruments relating to or affecting title to real property or acknowledged at all.

The provisions of this section shall relate and apply to all of such instruments which have been executed prior to May 4, 1937, as well as to all such instruments executed after said date, irrespective of whether said assignments, transfers, or endorsements were executed before or after May 4, 1937, and irrespective of whether such instruments and such assignments, transfers, and endorsements thereof were recorded before or after said date.

History.

Source:
L. 37:

P. 479, § 2.

CSA:

C. 40, § 107(1).

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-2.

38-35-103.
Acknowledgment before notary.

In addition to the officers empowered by law to take acknowledgments within or without the United States, deeds and other instruments in writing may be acknowledged before any notary public having a notarial seal.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 587, § 2.

CSA:

C. 40, § 108.

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-3.

38-35-104.
Acknowledged instruments as evidence.

All deeds, powers of attorney, agreements, or other instruments in writing conveying, encumbering, or affecting the title to real property, acknowledged or proved in accordance with this article or acknowledged, attested, or proved in accordance with the laws of this state or the local laws of the mining district wherein such real property is situate, in force at the date of such acknowledgment, attestation, or proof, may be read in evidence without further proof of the execution thereof. The record of any such deed, power of attorney, agreement, or other instrument in writing, whether an original record of any mining district or a copy thereof deposited in the county clerk and recorder’s office of any county in accordance with the laws of this state as a part of the records of such mining district or a record of such county clerk and recorder’s office when the same appears by such record to be properly acknowledged, attested, or proved in accordance with the laws of this state or of the proper mining district in force at the date of such acknowledgment, attestation, or proof, or a transcript from any such record certified by the county clerk and recorder of the proper county where such deed, power of attorney, or agreement made by law is recorded may be read in evidence with like effect as the original of such deed, agreement, power of attorney, or other instrument in writing, properly acknowledged, attested, or proved as provided in this article.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 587, § 3.

CSA:

C. 40, § 109.

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-4.

38-35-105.
Foreign instruments, prima facie evidence.

All deeds, powers of attorney, agreements, or other instruments in writing conveying, encumbering, or affecting title to real property in this state purporting to have been acknowledged or proved out of this state before a notary public or other officer empowered by the laws of this state to take acknowledgments, if the form of acknowledgment is in substantial compliance with the laws of the state or territory where taken or in substantial compliance with the requirement of this article, shall be deemed prima facie to have been properly acknowledged or proved before proper officers, and such deeds or other instruments in writing or the record thereof or a certified copy of the record thereof shall be received as prima facie evidence of the execution, acknowledgment, and delivery thereof.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 588, § 4.

CSA:

C. 40, § 110.

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-5.

38-35-106.
Deeds - acknowledgment, absent or defective - notice - deemed proper, when.

Any written instrument required or permitted to be acknowledged affecting title to real property, whether acknowledged, unacknowledged, or defectively acknowledged, after being recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where the real property is situate, shall be notice to all persons or classes of persons claiming any interest in said property.

Any unacknowledged or defectively acknowledged instrument which has remained of record for a period of ten years in such office shall be deemed to have been properly acknowledged. This section shall apply to all recorded instruments.

A document required or permitted to be acknowledged affecting title to real property that is signed in a person’s official capacity by a public trustee, county treasurer, county sheriff, or a deputy of such an official acting for that official that contains the seal of such an official shall be deemed to have been properly acknowledged.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 589, § 5.

CSA:

C. 40, § 111.

L. 37:

P. 481, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-6.

L. 59:

P. 641, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-6.

L. 2004:

(3) added, p. 1371, § 8, effective May 28.

38-35-106.5.
Written instruments - information regarding property description.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, any deed, power of attorney, agreement, or other instrument in writing executed and recorded on or after July 1, 1992, which contains a newly created legal description of real property shall include the name and address of the person who created such legal description. Nothing in this section shall affect the validity or recordability of any instrument which is prepared in violation of this section. Nothing in this section shall confer liability upon a person who prepares any instrument which is in violation of this section.

History.

Source:
L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 2107, § 1, effective April 9.

38-35-107.
Recitals in deeds prima facie evidence - when.

All recitals contained in deeds, powers of attorney, agreements, or other instruments in writing conveying, encumbering, or affecting title to real property that have remained of record in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where the real property affected is situated for a period of twenty years shall be accepted and received as prima facie evidence of the facts recited therein. This section shall not apply to the recitals, exceptions, and reservations described in section 38-35-108 and affidavits described in section 38-35-109 (5).

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 589, § 6.

CSA:

C. 40, § 112.

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-7.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 834, § 2, effective August 6.

38-35-108.
Reference to some other instrument affects only the parties thereto.

When a deed or any other instrument in writing affecting title to real property has been recorded and such deed or other instrument contains a recitation of or reference to some other instrument purporting to affect title to said real property, such recitation or reference shall bind only the parties to the instrument and shall not be notice to any other person whatsoever unless the instrument mentioned or referred to in the recital is of record in the county where the real property is situated. Unless the same is so recorded, no person other than the parties to the instrument shall be required to make any inquiry or investigation concerning such recitation or reference. All such recitations or references contained in deeds and instruments recorded prior to March 28, 1927, shall, after the expiration of one year from March 28, 1927, cease to be notice unless the instrument referred to in said reservation, exception, or reference is actually recorded within said one-year period.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 589, § 7.

CSA:

C. 40, § 113.

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-8.

38-35-109.
Instrument may be recorded - validity of unrecorded instruments - liability for fraudulent documents.

All deeds, powers of attorney, agreements, or other instruments in writing conveying, encumbering, or affecting the title to real property, certificates, and certified copies of orders, judgments, and decrees of courts of record may be recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where such real property is situated; except that all instruments conveying the title of real property to the state or a political subdivision shall be recorded pursuant to section 38-35-109.5. No such unrecorded instrument or document shall be valid against any person with any kind of rights in or to such real property who first records and those holding rights under such person, except between the parties thereto and against those having notice thereof prior to acquisition of such rights. This is a race-notice recording statute. In all cases where by law an instrument may be filed in the office of a county clerk and recorder, the filing thereof in such office shall be equivalent to the recording thereof, and the recording thereof in the office of such county clerk and recorder shall be equivalent to the filing thereof.

(1.5)

Any person may record in the office of the county clerk and recorder of any county a master form mortgage or master form deed of trust. Such forms shall be entitled to recordation without any acknowledgment or signature; without identification of any specific real property; and without naming any specific mortgagor, mortgagee, trustor, beneficiary, or trustee. Every instrument shall contain on the face of the document “Master form recorded by (name of person causing instrument to be recorded).” The county clerk and recorder shall index such master forms in the grantee index under the name of the person causing it to be recorded.

Any of the provisions of such master form instrument may be incorporated by reference in any mortgage or deed of trust encumbering real estate situated within the state, if such reference in the mortgage or deed of trust states the following:

That the master form instrument was recorded in the county in which the mortgage or deed of trust is offered for record;

The date when recorded and the book and page or pages or reception or index number where such master form was recorded;

That a copy of the provisions of the master form instrument was furnished to the person executing the mortgage or deed of trust; and

If fewer than all of the provisions of the referenced master form are being adopted or incorporated, a statement identifying by paragraph, section, or other specification method which will clearly identify the incorporated provision or provisions, provided that in the absence of specific designation, the entire referenced master form will be deemed to be incorporated.

The recording of any mortgage or deed of trust which has incorporated by reference any of the provisions of a master form recorded as provided in this section shall have the same effect as if such provisions of such master form had been set forth fully in the mortgage or deed of trust.

All deeds dated after January 1, 1977, and recorded with the county clerk and recorder pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall include a notation of the legal address of the grantee of the instrument, including road or street address if applicable. Any such deed submitted to the county clerk and recorder lacking such address shall not be recorded and shall be returned to the person requesting the recordation. Acceptance of a deed by the county clerk and recorder in violation of this subsection (2) shall not make such deed invalid. A notation as required in this subsection (2) may be made by a person other than the grantee after the execution of the deed.

Any person who offers to have recorded or filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder any document purporting to convey, encumber, create a lien against, or otherwise affect the title to real property, knowing or having a reason to know that such document is forged or groundless, contains a material misstatement or false claim, or is otherwise invalid, shall be liable to the owner of such real property for the sum of not less than one thousand dollars or for actual damages caused thereby, whichever is greater, together with reasonable attorney fees. Any grantee or other person purportedly benefited by a recorded document that purports to convey, encumber, create a lien against, or otherwise affect the title to real property and is forged or groundless, contains a material misstatement or false claim, or is otherwise invalid who willfully refuses to release such document of record upon request of the owner of the real property affected shall be liable to such owner for the damages and attorney fees provided for in this subsection (3).

Repealed.

An affidavit, executed under penalty of perjury, stating facts enumerated under paragraph (b) of this subsection (5) and made by a person who has actual knowledge of, and is competent to testify in a court of competent jurisdiction about, the facts in such affidavit may affect the title to real property within the state and may be recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder in the county in which the real property is situated.

When recorded, an affidavit as described in subsection (5)(a) of this section, or a certified copy of such affidavit, shall constitute prima facie evidence of one or more of the following facts:

The name, age, identity, residence, or service in the armed forces of any party;

Whether the land embraced in any conveyance or any part of such land or right therein has been in the actual possession of any party or parties within the chain of title;

If furnished by a professional land surveyor as defined in section 12-120-302 (6), a surveyor’s affidavit of correction in accordance with section 38-51-111 or a land survey plat in accordance with section 38-51-106, that reconciles conflicts and ambiguities in descriptions of land in recorded instruments;

A scrivener’s error.

An affidavit filed under this subsection (5) shall state that the affiant has actual knowledge of, and is competent to testify to, the facts in the affidavit and shall include a description of the land, the title that may be affected by facts stated in such affidavit, a reference to an instrument of record containing such description, the name of the person appearing by the record to be the owner of such land at the time of the recording of the affidavit, and an acknowledgment that the affiant is testifying under penalty of perjury. The recorder shall index the affidavit in the name of the record owner.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 590, § 8.

CSA:

C. 40, § 114.

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-9.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 753, § 2, effective January 1, 1977.

L. 80:

(1) amended and (3) and (4) added, p. 708, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 979, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 348, § 2, effective April 5.

L. 96:

(1), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1554, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(4) repealed, p. 38, § 3, effective March 20; (1) amended, p. 20, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1.5) added, p. 294, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(5) added, p. 835, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2010:

(5)(b)(III) amended,(HB 10-1085), ch. 95, p. 326, § 7, effective August 11.

L. 2019:

IP(5)(b) and (5)(b)(III) amended,(HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1723, § 235, effective October 1.

38-35-109.5.
Recording of instruments conveying real property to public entities.

Any instrument, including, but not limited to, a resolution, ordinance, deed, conveyance document, plat, or survey, conveying the title of real property to the state or a political subdivision shall be recorded in the office of the clerk and recorder of the county in which such real property is situated within thirty days of such conveyance. If the state or a political subdivision fails to record such instrument pursuant to this section, the state or political subdivision shall be liable for the amount of interest incurred by the county pursuant to the provisions of section 39-12-111, C.R.S., due to such failure to record.

For purposes of satisfying the recording requirement in subsection (1) of this section, the executive director of the appropriate state department or his or her designee shall record any instrument conveying the title of real property to the state, and a political subdivision shall designate an appropriate official or officials who shall record any instrument conveying the title of real property to the political subdivision.

For purposes of this section, “political subdivision” means a county, city and county, city, town, service authority, school district, local improvement district, law enforcement authority, water, sanitation, fire protection, metropolitan, irrigation, drainage, or other special district or any other kind of municipal, quasi-municipal, or public corporation organized pursuant to law.

History.

Source: L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 19, § 1, effective July 1.

38-35-110.
Lis pendens as notice - issuance of certificate - expiration.

After filing any pleading in an action in any court of record of this state or in any district court of the United States within this state wherein relief is claimed affecting the title to real property, any party to such action may record in the office of the county clerk and recorder in the county or counties in which the real property or any portion thereof is situated a notice of lis pendens containing the name of the court where such action is pending, the names of the parties to such action at the time of such recording, and a legal description of the real property. The failure to name a party or describe a portion of the real property in such notice shall not affect the sufficiency of such notice, or the sufficiency of an extension of such notice pursuant to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, as to the interest of the parties named in such notice or in such extension in the real property described therein. From the time of recording, such notice of lis pendens shall be notice to any person thereafter acquiring, by, through, or under any party named in such notice, an interest in the real property described in the notice in the county or counties where recorded that the interest so acquired may be affected by the action described in the notice.

Unless a timely notice of appeal is filed while a notice of lis pendens is in effect or unless the notice of lis pendens has expired and ceased to be notice as provided in subsection (6) of this section, except as provided in sections 38-22-132 and 38-22.5-111, a recorded notice of lis pendens shall remain in effect until the earliest of the following:

The action is dismissed without an order of the court;

Forty-nine days following the entry of an appealable order determining that certain real property specifically described in such order, or a specifically described interest therein, will not be affected by a judgment on the issues then pending, but the notice of lis pendens shall remain in effect as to all other real property described in such notice; or

Forty-nine days following the entry of final judgment in the trial court as to all parties and as to some or all of the real property described in the notice of lis pendens, or a specifically described interest therein, but the notice of lis pendens shall remain in effect as to all other property described in such notice.

For the purposes of subparagraphs (II) and (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the forty-nine-day period shall commence on the first day allowed for the filing of an appeal.

If a timely notice of appeal is filed while a notice of lis pendens is in effect or if the notice of lis pendens is filed after an appeal is filed, such notice of lis pendens shall remain in effect until the earliest of the following:

The notice of lis pendens expires and ceases to be notice as provided in subsection (6) of this section;

The court having jurisdiction over the action enters an order determining that the notice of lis pendens is no longer in effect;

Thirty-five days following the issuance of a mandate by the appellate court; except that, if the mandate issued by the appellate court remands the case to a lower court for further proceedings, the notice of lis pendens shall remain in effect subject to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2).

Upon request by any person, the clerk of the trial court shall issue a certificate stating whether, as of a specified date, a judgment was entered in the action described in such certificate and the date of such judgment or, if the action was dismissed, the date of such dismissal and whether such dismissal was by court order, by notice, or by stipulation. In either case, the certificate shall also state either that, as of a specified date, posttrial motions have not been filed or that posttrial motions have been filed, identifying such motions and the action, if any, taken on such motions and the date of such action. The certificate shall also state that either there is or is not an advisory copy of a notice of appeal of the action filed with the trial court.

Upon request by any person, the clerk of the appellate court shall issue a certificate stating, as of a specified date, either that appellate proceedings respecting the action described in such certificate have not been commenced or that such proceedings have been commenced and stating the date of such commencement. If appellate proceedings have been commenced, the certificate shall also state either that a formal mandate has or has not been issued and, if not issued, that either a judgment, an opinion of the court, and directions as to costs have not been issued or have been issued and the dates thereof.

Upon being recorded with the county clerk and recorder of the county or counties wherein the real property or any portion thereof is situated, any such certificate issued by the clerk of the trial court or the clerk of the appellate court shall constitute prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated.

Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a recorded notice of lis pendens which has not ceased to be in effect as provided in subsection (2) of this section shall expire and cease to be notice to any person for any purpose six years after the date of its recording, unless an extension of the notice of lis pendens is recorded prior to its expiration. A timely recorded extension showing the information required in subsection (1) of this section, showing that such is an extension of an original notice of lis pendens, and showing the recording date of the original notice of lis pendens shall extend the effect of the original notice for six years after the date of recording the extension or to such earlier date as such notice ceases to be in effect as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

A new notice of lis pendens meeting all the requirements of subsection (1) of this section may be recorded at any time while the action is pending and shall be notice to the same extent as provided in subsection (1) of this section; except that such new notice shall be notice only from the time of its recording.

Any notice of lis pendens recorded prior to March 20, 1992, which does not cease to be in effect as provided in subsection (2) of this section and which is not extended as provided in subsection (4) of this section shall expire and cease to be notice to any person for any purpose six years after the date of its recording or two years after March 20, 1992, whichever is later.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 590, § 9.

CSA:

C. 40, § 115.

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-10.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2103, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 51, § 3, effective March 21.

L. 2011:

IP(2)(a) amended,(SB 11-264), ch. 279, p. 1251, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(2) amended,(HB 14-1347), ch. 208, p. 770, § 6, effective July 1.

38-35-111.
Option to purchase - notice for one year only.

Recorded instruments in writing of the nature of an option to purchase affecting title to real property under the terms of which instruments possession is not delivered to the purchaser shall not constitute notice to any person for a period of more than one year after the time specified in such instrument for the conveyance of said property. After the expiration of such period, such instrument shall cease to be notice to any person for any purpose.

All such instruments which have been recorded prior to March 28, 1927, shall constitute notice only for one year from said date if the time for performance therein fixed has expired. Thereafter such instruments shall cease to be notice to any person for any purpose. In the event the time for performance specified in such instrument has not expired by March 28, 1927, such instrument shall constitute notice only for a period of one year from the time in said instrument specified for performance, and thereafter the same shall cease to be notice to any person for any purpose.

If a notice of lis pendens conforming to the requirements of section 38-35-110 is recorded prior to the expiration of the one-year period, such instrument shall continue to be notice until the later of the expiration of such period or the date the lis pendens ceases to be in effect or expires and ceases to be notice in accordance with the provisions of section 38-35-110.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 591, § 10.

CSA:

C. 40, § 116.

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-11.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 51, § 4, effective March 21.

38-35-112.
Certificate of death when properly recorded may be admitted as evidence.

A certificate of death or a verification of death document issued by a public official, whose apparent official duties include the keeping of records of death, of any state, territory, county, parish, district, city, town, village, province, nation, or other governmental agency or subdivision thereof or a copy of any such certificate of death or a verification of death document certified by such public official or by the county clerk and recorder of any county in the state of Colorado in whose office the same or a certified copy thereof has been recorded shall, insofar as the death may affect any interest in real property, be prima facie evidence of the death so certified and of the time and place of such death and shall be admissible in evidence in any court in the state of Colorado. Such method of proving death shall not be exclusive and nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the proof of the death of any person in any other manner authorized by law.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 591, § 11.

CSA:

C. 40, § 117.

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-12.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended,(HB 14-1073), ch. 30, p. 178, § 8, effective July 1.

38-35-113.
Affidavits referring to death, intestacy, heirship, accepted as prima facie evidence.

All statements relating to death, intestacy, heirship, relationship, age, sex, names, and identity of persons contained in affidavits which remain of record for a period of twenty years in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where the real property affected by the facts stated in such affidavits is situated shall be accepted and received as prima facie evidence of the facts stated in such affidavits insofar as such facts affect title to real property.

History.

Source:
L. 41:

P. 605, § 1.

CSA:

C. 40, § 117(1).

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-13.

38-35-114.
Actions - parties to be named.

No person claiming any interest in real property under or through a person named as a defendant in an action concerning real property to which the Colorado rules of civil procedure are applicable need be made a party to such action unless his interest is shown of record in the office of the county clerk and recorder in the county where such real property is situated, and the decree shall be as conclusive against him as if he had been made a party. If such action is for the recovery of actual possession of the property, the party in actual possession shall be made a party.

History.

Source:
L. 41:

P. 605, § 2.

CSA:

C. 40, § 117(2).

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-14.

38-35-115.
Execution by foreign representative of instrument regarding real estate prior to filing certified copies of order of appointment.

When, by statute in effect at the time of the execution by an executor, trustee, or other representative appointed by a court or tribunal of a state other than Colorado or of a territory of the United States or of a country beyond the limits of the United States of an instrument of conveyance or encumbrance or contract concerning real estate in Colorado in accordance with the powers conferred by a will, testament, or codicil admitted to probate by such court or tribunal, a certified copy or an exemplified copy of the letters testamentary or trusteeship issued by such court or tribunal under such will, testament, or codicil or of the order of appointment by such court or tribunal is required to be filed for record with the county clerk and recorder of the county wherein is situated such real estate, the filing for record with such county clerk and recorder of such certified copy or exemplified copy of letters or order after the execution of such instrument of conveyance or encumbrance or contract shall have the same force and effect that it would have had if it had been filed for record with such county clerk and recorder prior to the execution of such instrument of conveyance or encumbrance or contract, whether such instrument of conveyance or encumbrance or contract was executed before or after April 17, 1941, and whether such certified copy or exemplified copy was so filed for record before or after said date.

History.

Source:
L. 41:

P. 605, § 3.

CSA:

C. 40, § 117(3).

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-15.

38-35-116.
Variances in names in instruments affecting the title to real property.

The middle name or the initial of a middle name appearing in a name contained in an instrument affecting the title to real property or in a signature or an acknowledgment shall be deemed prima facie to be a material part of such name.

One or more of the following variances between any two instruments affecting the title to the same real property shall not destroy or impair the presumption that the person so named is the same person in both instruments:

The full first name appearing in one and only the initial letter of that first name appearing in the other;

A full middle name appearing in one and only the initial letter of that middle name appearing in the other;

The initial letter of a middle name appearing in one and not appearing in the other; or

A full middle name appearing in one and not appearing in the other.

In spite of a variance described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), the person so named in both instruments shall be presumed to be the same person until such time as the contrary appears, and, until such time, such instruments, the record of such instruments, or a certified copy of the record of such instruments shall be admissible in evidence as though the names in the two instruments were identical.

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 2003, p. 833, § 1, effective August 6, 2003.)

The word “instruments” as used in this section means not only instruments voluntarily executed but also papers filed or issued in or in connection with actions and other proceedings in court and orders, judgments, and decrees entered therein and transcripts of such judgments, proceedings in foreclosure pursuant to powers of sale, certificates of birth, certificates of death, and certificates of marriage.

History.

Source:
L. 41:

P. 607, § 1.

CSA:

C. 40, § 117(4).

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-16.

L. 61:

P. 644, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-16.

L. 73:

P. 613, § 4.

L. 2003:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 833, § 1, effective August 6.

38-35-117.
Mortgages, not a conveyance - lien theory.

Mortgages, trust deeds, or other instruments intended to secure the payment of an obligation affecting title to or an interest in real property shall not be deemed a conveyance, regardless of its terms, so as to enable the owner of the obligation secured to recover possession of real property without foreclosure and sale, but the same shall be deemed a lien.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 592, § 12.

CSA:

C. 40, § 118.

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-17.